Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5265YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2128 Section 1. Section 252B.9, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. (1) As used in this paragraph, 3 âdigital financial accountâ means an online account that stores, 4 transfers, or receives moneys digitally. 5 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law making such 6 information confidential, child support services or a child 7 support agency may subpoena records relating to digital 8 financial accounts, including identifying information, 9 transaction histories, deposit or withdrawal records, 10 employment-related payments, contractor payments, or other 11 income relevant to the establishment, modification, or 12 enforcement of a support obligation. 13 (3) A parent or putative father who fails to comply with a 14 subpoena issued under this paragraph, and who lacks good cause 15 as defined in paragraph âfâ , subparagraph (3), is guilty of a 16 class âDâ felony. 17